Washington statutes.
RCW 43.42.040

Maintaining and furnishing information—Contact point—Service center—Website.

(1) The office shall assist citizens, businesses, and project proponents by maintaining and furnishing information, including, but not limited to:

(a) To the extent possible, compiling and periodically updating one or more handbooks containing lists and explanations of permit laws, including all relevant local, state, federal, and tribal laws. In providing this information, the office shall seek the cooperation of relevant local, state, and federal agencies and tribal governments;

(b) Establishing and providing notice of a point of contact for obtaining information;

(c) Working closely and cooperatively with business license centers to provide efficient and nonduplicative service; and

(d) Developing a service center and a website.

(2) The office shall coordinate among state agencies to develop an office website that is linked through the office of the governor's website and that contains information regarding permitting and regulatory requirements for businesses and citizens in Washington state. At a minimum, the website shall provide information or links to information on:

(a) Federal, state, and local rule-making processes and permitting and regulatory requirements applicable to Washington businesses and citizens;

(b) Federal, state, and local licenses, permits, and approvals necessary to start and operate a business or develop real property in Washington;

(c) State and local building codes;

(d) Federal, state, and local economic development programs that may be available to businesses in Washington; and

(e) State and local agencies regulating or providing assistance to citizens and businesses operating a business or developing real property in Washington.

(3) This section does not create an independent cause of action, affect any existing cause of action, or create any new cause of action regarding the application of regulatory or permit requirements.

[ 2007 c 94 s 5; 2003 c 71 s 4; 2002 c 153 s 5.]